Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB235.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5607(d)(34) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5607. Purposes and powers.* * *(d) Powers.--Every authority may exercise all powers necessary or convenient for the carrying out of the purposes set forth in this section, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following rights and powers:* * *(34) In the case of an authority that performs storm water planning, management and implementation, reasonable and uniform rates [may] shall be based in whole or in part on 1234567891011121314151617 property characteristics, which [may] shall include installation and maintenance of best management practices approved and inspected by the authority[.] and, in the case of a normal agricultural operation, best management practices approved by the United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service or the State Conservation Commission.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0235PN0188 - 2 - 123456789